Utah statutes.
10-15-5.   Powers of acquisition and improvement.

The legislative body of the municipalities shall also have the power to acquire by gift, purchase, eminent domain, or otherwise, land, real property or rights of way which shall become part of the municipal street established as a pedestrian mall, or which shall otherwise be used by the municipality as a part of, or for purposes connected with, a pedestrian mall, and such lands, real property or rights of way may be improved in the same manner as municipal streets may be improved. The legislative body shall also have the power to make such improvements on mall intersections and intersecting streets or upon facilities acquired for parking and other related purposes where such improvements are necessary or convenient to the operation of the mall. The acquisitions and improvements authorized by this section shall be deemed "improvements."

